dictsource/tg_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Tajik

.group а
        а         a

.group б
        б         b

.group в
        в         v

.group г
        г         g

.group ғ
        ғ         Q"

.group д
        д         d

.group е
     _) е         je
        е         e

.group ё
        ё         jO

.group ж
        ж         Z

.group з
        з         z

.group и
        и         i

.group ӣ
        ӣ         'i

.group й
        й         j

.group к
        к         k

.group л
        л         l

.group м
        м         m

.group н
        н         n

.group о
        о         O

.group п
        п         p

.group р
        р         r

.group с
        с         s

.group т
        т         t

.group у
        у         u

.group ӯ
        ӯ         8

.group ф
        ф         f

.group х
        х         x

.group ҳ
        ҳ         h

.group ч
        ч         tS

.group ҷ
        ҷ         J
		
.group ш
        ш         S

.group ъ
        ъ         ?

.group э
        э         e

.group ю
        ю         ju
        
.group я
        я         ja 

.group
   $      dOllar
